Illinois, session 104th, HB800.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5changing Section 101 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/101)  (from Ch. 120, par. 1-101)7    Sec. 101. Short Title. This Act shall be known and and may 8be cited as the "Illinois Income Tax Act."9(Source: P.A. 76-261.)